Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YOUTH INTERVENTION PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for youth intervention programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.43. These amounts are ongoing and are added to the base. new text end